Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.6575] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of sections 144.6575 to 144.6578, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Health care facility. new text end new text begin "Health care facility" means: new text end new text begin (1) a hospital licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56; new text end new text begin (2) a medical facility as defined in section 144.561; new text end new text begin (3) a physician's office or health care clinic where licensed practitioners provide health care to patients; new text end new text begin (4) a nonprofit community clinic, including a federally qualified health center, a rural health clinic, public health clinic, or other community clinic that provides health care; new text end new text begin (5) a nursing home as defined in section 144A.01, subdivision 5; or new text end new text begin (6) an assisted living facility as defined in section 144G.08, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin "Law enforcement agency" means any local, state, or federal entity with statutory police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized to make arrests. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Judicial warrant. new text end new text begin "Judicial warrant" or "judicial order authorizing the arrest" means a written order from a state court or federal Article III court that directs a law enforcement agency or another person who is specifically named in the order to arrest a person. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Law enforcement agent. new text end new text begin "Law enforcement agent" means a person employed by a law enforcement agency who is authorized to make a civil arrest. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Patient. new text end new text begin "Patient" means a person who receives health care services at a health care facility. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Resident. new text end new text begin "Resident" means a person admitted to a nursing home or assisted living facility. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [144.6576] LIMITS ON ACCESS TO PREMISES BY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENTS ENGAGED IN CIVIL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Limits on access to health care facility premises. new text end new text begin A health care facility must not consent to a law enforcement agent entering a health care facility site for purposes of civil immigration enforcement unless the law enforcement agent provides the health care facility employee with a valid judicial warrant. The health care facility employee must request that the law enforcement agent provide valid identification and must grant entry only to the areas identified in the judicial warrant. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notification required. new text end new text begin A health care facility employee granting entry to a law enforcement agent engaged in civil immigration enforcement must immediately notify the person with administrative control of the health care facility and the health care facility's general counsel or other designated legal representative. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [144.6577] HEALTH CARE FACILITIES; POLICIES REGARDING CIVIL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ON PREMISES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Policies regarding law enforcement agent present at health care facility. new text end new text begin By ......., a health care facility must develop and implement a policy regarding interactions between health care facility employees and law enforcement agents present at the health care facility and involved in civil immigration activities. Each policy must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name and contact information of a person or persons designated to be notified of the presence of a law enforcement agent at the health care facility. The designated contact person or persons must be legal counsel of the health care facility or other persons within the management or administration of the health care facility; new text end new text begin (2) procedures to verify the identity and authority of any law enforcement agent present at the health care facility, including but not limited to requesting and documenting the first and last name of the law enforcement agent, the name of the law enforcement agency, and the badge number of any law enforcement agent present with a patient or resident or requesting information about a patient or resident; and new text end new text begin (3) procedures regarding a law enforcement agent's access to the health care facility premises. A law enforcement agent must not access nonpublic areas of a health care facility unless the law enforcement agent provides to a health care facility employee a valid judicial warrant or is requested by health care facility staff to respond to a safety or security issue within the health care facility. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Policies regarding release of information to law enforcement agent. new text end new text begin By ......., a health care facility must develop and implement a policy regarding releasing patient or resident information to a law enforcement agent present at the health care facility. Each policy must include: new text end new text begin (1) procedures to ensure that any protected health information requested by a law enforcement agent is released in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), if applicable; and new text end new text begin (2) procedures that provide that, unless required by state or federal law, a health care facility employee may only release patient or resident information to a law enforcement agent engaging in civil immigration enforcement if the law enforcement agent provides: new text end new text begin (i) a valid subpoena issued by a federal judge or magistrate; new text end new text begin (ii) a valid order issued by a federal judge or magistrate to require access to the health care facility premises; or new text end new text begin (iii) a valid warrant issued by a federal judge or magistrate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Policies protecting patient and resident information. new text end new text begin By ......., a health care facility must develop procedures to ensure that patients and residents are provided with the following documents: new text end new text begin (1) if the health care facility is subject to HIPAA, a notice of privacy practices for protected health information, including information about the patient's or resident's right to request an amendment to any protected health information or record about the patient or resident maintained in a designated record set, which may include a request that any of the following information be deleted, redacted, or amended: place of birth; immigration or citizenship status; or information from a birth certificate, passport, permanent resident card, alien registration card, or employment authorization documents; and new text end new text begin (2) a form enabling a patient or resident to authorize the health care facility to disclose the patient's or resident's health status, including admission and discharge information, to the parents, guardians, relatives, or other designees of the patient or resident. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Health care facility employee training. new text end new text begin A health care facility must provide health care facility employees, security personnel, and designated contact persons with training annually on the policies in subdivisions 1 and 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Policy provided to commissioner. new text end new text begin A health care facility must submit the policies required in subdivisions 1 and 2 to the commissioner by ........ A health care facility that fails to comply with the requirements in subdivisions 1 and 2 will be notified of noncompliance by the commissioner and may be subject to the imposition of a fine by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Investigation. new text end new text begin The commissioner may investigate and respond to complaints from patients, residents, health care facility employees, and the public alleging noncompliance with this section. A health care facility and its agents must not retaliate against a patient, a resident, employees, or an agent who files a complaint under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Posting immigration rights information on premises. new text end new text begin A health care facility must post, either by physical or electronic means, a document providing the phone number that individuals may call to learn about immigration rights. The document must be posted on the premises of the health care facility in a conspicuous location that is accessible to patients, residents, employees, and visitors. The commissioner must develop and provide the document to health care facilities. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [144.6578] LIABILITY LIMITATIONS; DEFENSES. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in sections 144.6575 to 144.6577 permits an action against a health care facility employee acting lawfully when engaging in reasonable compliance with the provisions of sections 144.6575 to 144.6577. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in sections 144.6575 to 144.6577 affects any right or defense of any health care facility employee acting lawfully. new text end